Massachusetts, session 194th, S1763.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 81 of Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 13 by inserting the following after the words “twenty-
two.”:-
“Direct supervision” for the purpose of work on a fire protection sprinkler system shall
mean the physical on-site presence with the assigned apprentice and their supervising
journeyman or fire protection sprinkler contractor.”
SECTION 2. Section 85A of Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 2 by striking the word “his” and inserting in place
thereof the following: “their”
SECTION 3. Section 85A of Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 4 by striking the word “he” and inserting in place
thereof the following: “they”;
of 3

SECTION 4. Section 85A of Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 6 by striking the word “his” and inserting in place
thereof the following: “their”;
SECTION 5. Section 85A of Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 7 by striking the word “he is” and inserting in place
thereof the following: “they are”;
SECTION 6. Section 85A of Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 7 by striking the word “his” and inserting in place
thereof the following: “their”;
SECTION 7. Section 85A of Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 8 by striking the word “his” and inserting in place
thereof the following: “their”;
SECTION 8. Section 85A of Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 10 by striking the word “him” and inserting in place
thereof the following: “them”;
SECTION 9. Section 85A of Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 14 after the word “fitter.” the following:-
“Direct supervision” for the purposes of this section shall mean the physical on-site
presence with the assigned apprentice and their supervising journeyman or fire protection
sprinkler contractor while conducting work on a fire protection sprinkler system.”
of 3

SECTION 10. Section 85A of Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the following in lines 14-16:-
“A fire protection sprinkler contractor may employ one or more apprentices but not more
than one apprentice may be so employed for each journeyman sprinkler fitter.”
SECTION 11. Section 85A of Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 14 after the word “fitter” the following:-
“The ratio permitted shall be one licensed journeyman sprinkler fitter or fire protection sprinkler
contractor for every apprentice sprinkler fitter on the jobsite.”
SECTION 12. Section 89 of Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 4 after the word “eighty-one” by inserting the
following:- “including sections eighty-four through eighty-six,”.
of 3